test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Ж_А-революция_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - революция M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      революция+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: револю́ция
      революция+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: револю́цию
      революция+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: револю́ции
      революция+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: револю́ции
      революция+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: револю́ции
      революция+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: револю́цией
      революция+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: револю́ции
      революция+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: револю́ции
      революция+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: револю́ций
      революция+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: револю́циях
      революция+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: револю́циям
      революция+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: револю́циями
